Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3980.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.993, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Bonds. (a) A county may, by resolution, authorize, issue, and sell its bonds, notes, or other obligations for the purposes specified in subdivision 2. The county may also, by resolution, issue bonds to refund the bonds issued pursuant to this subdivision. (b) The bonds may be limited obligations, payable solely from or secured by taxes levied under this section, and the county may also pledge its full faith, credit, and taxing power as additional security for the bonds. A regional railroad authority within the county may also pledge its taxing powers as additional security for the bonds. (c) A county may issue and sell bonds in one or more series and without an election. The county may determine how the bonds shall be secured; how the bonds will bear interest, and the rate or rates, or variable rate; the rank or priority; how the bonds will be executed and be payable, and how they will mature; and how the bonds will be subject to any defaults, redemptions, repurchases, tender options, or other terms. The county may also determine how the bonds shall be sold. (d) The county may enter into and perform all contracts deemed necessary or desirable by it to issue and secure the bonds, including an indenture of trust with a trustee located within or outside of the state. (e) Before issuing bonds qualifying under this section, the county must publish a notice of its intention to issue the bonds and the date and time of a hearing to obtain public comment on the matter. The notice must be published in the official newspaper of the county or in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The notice must be published at least deleted text begin 14deleted text end new text begin tennew text end , but not more than 28, days before the date of the hearing. (f) Any project financed with bonds issued under this section must be included in a capital improvement plan as defined in section 373.40, subdivision 3. For purposes of this paragraph, "project" means any project described in subdivision 2, notwithstanding section 373.40, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). (g) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the bonds must be issued and sold in the manner provided under chapter 475. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 469.060, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Detail; maturity. The port authority with the consent of its city's council shall set the date, denominations, place of payment, form, and details of the bonds. deleted text begin The bonds must mature serially.deleted text end The first installment must be due in not more than three years and the last in not more than 30 years from the date of issuance.